Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.212

Washington professional educator standards board—Duties.

The professional educator standards board shall:

(1) Develop and maintain a research base of educator preparation best practices;

(2) Develop and coordinate initiatives for educator preparation in high-demand fields as well as outreach and recruitment initiatives for underrepresented populations;

(3) Provide program improvement technical assistance to providers of educator preparation programs;

(4) Assure educator preparation program compliance; and

(5) Prepare and maintain a cohesive educator development policy framework.

[ 2009 c 531 s 1.]